Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. Beginning Proceedings

§ 15-6-201.
Generally; ordinance or resolution required.

If any city or town makes local improvements or establishes or alters the grade of any street at the cost and expense, in whole or in part, of property specially benefited thereby, the proceedings shall be as provided in this chapter.

Any such improvement may be ordered only by ordinance or resolution of the governing body.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 336; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-336; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance

with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

Resolution and maps not giving specific information held notin compliance. —

Even if the failure of the city to place grade maps in the clerk's office in accordance with the published notice is disregarded, there was no real compliance, as far as grades were concerned, with this section and §

15-6-202

, where the published resolution did not in itself provide any specific information, and such maps as were placed in the offices of the engineers contained information as to the proposed improvements, but were comparatively meaningless except as they might be correlated with the existing elevations which with minor exceptions were not shown, and the city manager testified that the delivery of the maps to the city did not occur until after the beginning of the protest period. Gorrell v. Casper, 371 P.2d 835,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1962) (decided under former similar provisions).

§ 15-6-202.
Initiative resolution; contents; acceptable bids; notice to be published and mailed; caption.

Any improvement may be initiated directly by the governing body by resolution declaring its intention to make improvements. The resolution shall specify with convenient certainty the streets or part thereof proposed to be improved, if the improvements are street improvements, the boundaries of the proposed assessment district, the character, kind and extent of the improvements and if paving is involved, the kinds of paving to be used. The resolution shall specify an estimate of the cost of the total improvement project and of each proposed assessment unit, if any, and also an estimate of the contract price of the total improvement project. The governing body shall not accept any bids or combination of bids which exceed by more than ten percent (10%) the estimates of the contract price, unless the legal owners of record of all property in the district waive this limitation.

If an improvement will result in a change in existing street elevations or grades, it is sufficient if the resolution of intention so states without a description, directly or by reference, of the extent or location of the change.

If any part of an improvement is to be paid out of the general fund or road fund of the city or town, or out of funds available to the city or town from any other source, the resolution shall so state. If the improvement is to be maintained by the contractor for a specified period, not to exceed five (5) years, the resolution shall contain a statement to that effect and that the charge for maintenance is to be included in the assessment for the improvement.

The resolution shall fix the time and place, when and where the governing body will meet to consider any remonstrances and objections to the proposed improvements, and the time within which remonstrances and objections must be filed with the city or town recorder. It shall direct the recorder to give a fifteen (15) day notice to all legal owners of record of the property liable to assessment for the proposed improvements by publishing the resolution in one (1) issue of some newspaper published in the city or town once a week or more often. If no newspaper is published within the city or town, notice may be published in any newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week or more often. In addition to the publication, a copy of the resolution of intention shall be mailed, postage prepaid, at least fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing, to each legal owner of record of the property within the proposed district.

The resolution when published and mailed as a notice shall have the following caption:

“Notice to all persons liable to assessment for the improvement of (state names of streets or if improvement is not to be located in the streets, identify by general character and general location). The governing body of the city (city or town) on the
. . . . .
day of
. . . . .
passed the following resolution of intention.”

The resolution shall be set forth in full immediately after the caption of the notice.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 337; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-337; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 48, § 1.

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance

with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

Composition of improvement district. —

Under this section and §§

15-6-101

,

15-6-206

and

15-6-302

, an improvement district may be composed of two or more parallel streets. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Reasonable description of property required. —

While requirements of this section, that resolution of intention state the character, kind and extent of a contemplated improvement, cannot be so rigidly construed as where plans and specifications are made before the passage of the resolution, instead of afterward, as provided by §

15-6-206

, a reasonable description of the improvement contemplated should be given. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Objection to defective resolution. —

Even if legislature did not intend by §

15-6-408

, making confirmation by council final and conclusive against all parties not filing objections as required by §

15-6-405

, to make all steps not constitutionally necessary irregularities only on collateral attack, a defect in resolution of intention in not sufficiently stating character and extent of proposed improvement, as required by this section, cannot be taken advantage of in a suit to enjoin collection of an assessment by property owners who filed no objections to confirmation thereof. Bass v. Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 420, 208 P. 439 (Wyo. 1922).

Failure to remonstrate as to inadequate notice does not waiveobjection. —

Failure to remonstrate to the city council on the question of claimed inadequacy of notice of intention to change grades was not a waiver of the right to object. Gorrell v. Casper, 371 P.2d 835,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1962).

Resolution and maps not giving specific information held notin compliance. —

See same catchline under §

15-6-201

.

Provisions as to finality of action inapplicable if matternot properly published. —

Where nothing in the publication of a resolution of intention or in supplementary maps related directly and concretely to change in grade, it would be wholly unwarranted to provide that there could be a waiver as to a matter which was never before the property owners as required by statute. Consequently, § 15-6-105(a) has no application. Gorrell v. Casper, 371 P.2d 835,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1962).

Cited

in

Mealey v. City of Laramie, 485 P.2d 1019,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 222

(Wyo. 1971); Blount v. City of Laramie, 510 P.2d 294,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Cotenancy as factor in determining representation of property owners in petition for, or remonstrance against, public improvement, 3 ALR2d 127.

Right of owners of property abutting street to compensation for establishing or paving over parkway in center of street, or paving roadway adjacent to parkway, 81 ALR2d 1436.

Inclusion or exclusion of first and last days in computing time for giving notice of hearing as to street improvements, which notice must be given a certain number of days before a known future date, 234 Ark. 518, 353 S.W.2d 168, 1962 Ark. LEXIS 719 (1962).

§ 15-6-203.
Protest petitions; requirements for abandonment; initiative petitions.

At any time within fifteen (15) days from the publication of the resolution of intention, the owners of property situated within the proposed assessment district may file with the city clerk their written objections to the proposed improvement. If protests against the making of the improvements are filed by the legal owners of record of more than one-half (1/2) of the area of the property subject to assessment therefor, within an assessment district, the proposed improvements within that district shall be abandoned. No protest will be considered unless filed within fifteen (15) days after the publication of resolution of intention. If any petition is filed signed by the owners of fifty percent (50%) of the property proposed in the petition to be assessed for any local improvement, the governing body shall proceed with the type of improvement set forth in the petition, following the same procedure as though initiated by resolution.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 338; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-338; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance

with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

Protests by owners in local district or enlarged district.—

The legislature contemplated that a protest by the owners of over one-half of the property situated in either the local improvement district or the enlarged district (which includes the smaller) would be sufficient to prevent further proceedings. Gorrell v. Casper, 371 P.2d 835,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1962).

Stated

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 490 P.2d 1069,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 15-6-204.
Authority to act and assess; deletions or modifications.

Upon passage and publication of the resolution of intention the governing body has jurisdiction and the right to pass any and all ordinances and resolutions, to do any and all acts necessary to prosecute the improvement to completion and to make and levy an assessment to pay for the improvement.

If no remonstrances are made and filed or if all remonstrances filed are overruled by the governing body, it shall delete or modify the improvements and delete any property to be assessed as it considers proper and shall cause the improvements to be begun and prosecuted with reasonable diligence until completed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 339, 340; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-339, 15.1-340; W.S. 1977, §§

15-6-204

,

15-6-205

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-205.
Streets; improving intervening parts; objection thereto.

If the improvement proposed is to a street, either by grading or regrading, paving or repaving, macadamizing or remacadamizing, graveling or regraveling, constructing crosswalks, gutters, curbs or providing for surface drainage, and not more than two (2) blocks remain unimproved in the street between improvements either already made or proposed to be made, the governing body on its own motion may cause the intervening or unimproved part to be improved. The improvement of that part shall not be stayed, defeated or prevented by any remonstrance or other objection, unless the governing body considers the remonstrance or objection proper to stay or prevent the improvement.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 341; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-341; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-206

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-206.
Ordinance ordering improvement; contents.

Upon the hearing of the resolution of intention, if the governing body decides to proceed with the improvement, it shall pass an ordinance, which shall recite:

The passage of the resolution of intention;

The date of the hearing; and

Whether or not remonstrances were filed and if any were filed, the action of the governing body thereon.

The ordinance shall also:

Order the improvements;

Describe the improvements proposed to be made;

Direct the city engineer to prepare plans and specifications therefor; and

Fix the boundaries of the assessment district, which shall include all property to be assessed for the improvements.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 342; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-342; W.S. 1977, § 15-6-207; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.